Indiana, session 2026, SB199.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-26-14-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.43-2021,
SECTION 78, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The association must establish a case review
panel that meets the following requirements:
(1) The panel has nine (9) members.
(2) The secretary of education or the secretary's designee is a
member of the panel and is the chairperson of the panel.
(3) The secretary of education appoints as members of the panel
persons having the following qualifications:
(A) Four (4) parents of high school students.
(B) Two (2) high school principals.
(C) Two (2) high school athletic directors.
(B) Four (4) school administrators.
(4) The secretary of education shall administer the functions of
the panel.
(5) A member of the panel serves for a four (4) year term, subject
to the following:
(A) An appointee who ceases to meet the member's
qualification under subdivision (3) ceases to be a member of
the panel.
(B) The secretary of education shall appoint fifty percent
SEA 199 — CC 1

2
(50%) of the initial appointees under each clause in
subdivision (3) for terms of two (2) years, so that terms of the
panel are staggered.
(6) The panel must meet monthly, unless there are no cases before
the panel. The panel may meet more frequently at the call of the
chairperson. However, the chairperson must call a meeting within
five (5) business days, or as soon thereafter as a quorum can be
assembled, after the panel receives a case in which time is a factor
in relation to the scheduling of an athletic competition.
(7) A quorum of the panel is five (5) members. The affirmative
vote of the greater of the majority present or four (4) members of
the panel is required for the panel to take action.
(b) A student's parent who disagrees with a decision of the
association concerning the application or interpretation of a rule of the
association to the student shall have the right to do one (1) of the
following:
(1) Accept the decision.
(2) Refer the case to the panel. The parent must refer the case to
the panel not later than thirty (30) days after the date of the
association's decision.
(c) After a case is referred under subsection (b)(2), the panel must
do the following:
(1) Collect testimony and information on the case, including
testimony and information from both the association and the
parent.
(2) Place the case on the panel's agenda and consider the case at
a meeting of the panel.
(3) Not later than ten (10) business days after the meeting at
which the panel considers the case, issue a written decision that
does one (1) of the following:
(A) Upholds the association's decision on the case.
(B) Modifies the association's decision on the case.
(C) Nullifies the association's decision on the case.
(d) Subject to section 7 of this chapter, the association must
implement the decision of the panel on each case. However, a decision
of the panel:
(1) applies only to the case before the panel; and
(2) does not affect any rule of the association or decision under
any rule concerning any student other than the student whose
parent referred the case to the panel.
(e) The association shall pay all costs attributable to the operation
of the panel, including travel and a stipend of at least fifty dollars ($50)
SEA 199 — CC 1

3
for each meeting for panel members.
SECTION 2. IC 20-28-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this section, "teacher
candidate" means an individual recommended for an initial teaching
license from a teacher preparation program located in Indiana.
(b) As used in this section, "teacher preparation program" includes,
but is not limited to, the following:
(1) A teacher education school or department.
(2) A transition to teaching program under IC 20-28-4.
(3) Any other entity approved by the department to offer a course
of study leading to an initial teaching license.
(c) The department shall:
(1) arrange a statewide system of professional instruction for
teacher education;
(2) accredit and review teacher preparation programs that comply
with the rules of the department;
(3) approve content area licensure programs for particular kinds
of teachers in accredited teacher preparation programs; and
(4) specify the types of licenses for individuals who complete
programs of approved courses.
(d) The department shall work with teacher preparation programs to
develop a system of teacher education that ensures individuals who
complete teacher preparation programs are able to meet the highest
professional standards.
(e) Before July 1, 2015, the department shall establish standards for
the continuous improvement of program processes and the performance
of individuals who complete teacher preparation programs. The state
board shall adopt rules containing the standards not later than two
hundred seventy (270) days after the department finishes the standards.
(f) The standards established under subsection (e) must include
benchmarks for performance, including test score data for each teacher
preparation entity on content area licensure tests and test score data for
each teacher preparation entity on pedagogy licensure tests.
(g) Each teacher preparation program shall annually report the
program's performance on the standards and benchmarks established
under this section to the department. The department shall make the
information reported under this subsection available to the public on
the department's website. Each teacher preparation program shall make
the information reported under this subsection available to the public
on the teacher preparation program's website. In addition to reporting
performance, each teacher preparation program must report to the
SEA 199 — CC 1

4
department the following:
(1) The attrition, retention, and completion rates of teacher
candidates for the previous three (3) calendar years. The teacher
preparation program must also provide underlying data, as
determined by the department, used as part of calculating the
teacher preparation program's retention rates.
(2) The number of teacher candidates in each content area who
complete the teacher preparation program during the year,
disaggregated by ranges of cumulative grade point averages.
(3) The number of teacher candidates in each content area who,
during the year:
(A) do not pass a content area licensure examination; and
(B) do not retake the content area licensure examination.
(h) In making information available to the public on the
department's website, the department shall include in the report under
subsection (g), in addition to the matrix ratings described in subsection
(i), the following information:
(1) Average scaled or standard scores of teacher candidates who
complete teacher preparation programs on basic skills, content
area, and pedagogy licensure examinations.
(2) The average number of times teacher candidates who
complete a teacher preparation program take each licensing test
before receiving a passing score and the percentage of teacher
candidates who receive a passing score on each licensing test on
the teacher candidates' first attempts.
(i) Not later than July 30, 2016, the department and the commission
for higher education, in conjunction with the state board, the
Independent Colleges of Indiana, Inc., and teacher preparation
programs, shall establish a matrix rating system for teacher preparation
programs based on the performance of the programs as demonstrated
by the data collected under subsections (g) and (h). The matrix rating
system must be based on data collected for teachers who initially
receive their teaching license during the previous three (3) years. The
department shall make the matrix ratings available to the public on the
department's website.
(j) Each teacher preparation program shall report to the department,
in a manner prescribed by the department, the teacher preparation
program's admission practices, in accordance with:
(1) the Council for the Accreditation of Educator Preparation
standards, for teacher preparation programs accredited by the
Council for the Accreditation of Educator Preparation;
(2) rigorous academic entry requirements for admission into a
SEA 199 — CC 1

5
teacher preparatory program that are equivalent to the minimum
academic requirements determined by the Council for the
Accreditation of Educator Preparation, for teacher preparation
programs that are not accredited by the Council for the
Accreditation of Educator Preparation; or
(3) the Association for Advancing Quality in Educator
Preparation standards, for teacher preparation programs
accredited by the Association for Advancing Quality in Educator
Preparation; or
(4) the department's admission standards for teacher
preparation programs accredited by the department.
The department shall include information reported to the department
on the department's website.
(k) Not later than July 30, 2016, the department and the commission
for higher education, in conjunction with the state board, the
Independent Colleges of Indiana, Inc., and teacher preparation
programs, shall establish a minimum rating under the matrix rating
system established under subsection (i) that teacher preparation
programs must achieve to avoid referral under subsection (l).
(l) Not later than July 1 of each year, the department shall submit a
list of teacher preparation programs that do not meet the minimum
rating established under subsection (k) or the requirements of section
3.1 or 3.2 of this chapter to the commission for higher education and
the Independent Colleges of Indiana, Inc. for one (1) of the following
actions:
(1) In the case of a state educational institution, the commission
for higher education shall place the teacher preparation program
on an improvement plan with clear performance goals and a
designated period in which the performance goals must be
achieved.
(2) In the case of a proprietary postsecondary educational
institution, the commission for higher education shall recommend
to the teacher preparation program an improvement plan with
clear performance goals and a designated period in which the
performance goals should be achieved.
(3) In the case of a nonprofit college or university, the
Independent Colleges of Indiana, Inc., shall coordinate a peer
review process to make recommendations to the peer institution
in achieving the department's performance metrics.
(m) The department shall approve at least two (2) accreditors that:
(1) accredit teacher preparation programs; and
(2) are recognized by the Council for Higher Education
SEA 199 — CC 1

6
Accreditation;
to accredit teacher preparation programs for use in Indiana. The
department may also serve as an accreditor in addition to the two
(2) accreditors approved under this subsection.
(n) Not later than December 31, 2024, the department and the
commission for higher education, in conjunction with the state board,
shall partner with teacher preparation programs to receive an outside
evaluation by a nationally recognized nonprofit, nonpartisan
organization that leverages evidence based approaches on the science
of reading to evaluate teacher preparation reading instruction programs.
SECTION 3. IC 20-28-10-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) As used in this section,
"stillbirth" means a birth after twenty (20) weeks of gestation that
is not a live birth.
(b) Not later than December 1, 2026, the secretary of education
shall do the following:
(1) Identify school corporations that provide employees paid
leave upon any of the following events:
(A) The birth of an employee's child.
(B) The birth of a child to an employee's spouse.
(C) The placement of a child for adoption with an
employee.
(D) The placement of a child in foster care with an
employee.
(E) The stillbirth of an employee's child.
(2) Identify the length of paid leave school corporations
provide for each event under subdivision (1).
(3) Make recommendations concerning paid leave for
employees for each event under subdivision (1).
(4) Submit the findings and recommendations under this
subsection to the general assembly in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6.
(c) This section expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. IC 20-30-5-7.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 7.4. (a) Not later than December 1, 2026, the
secretary of education shall do the following:
(1) Identify key metrics and activities to be used to measure
civic literacy and engagement in kindergarten through grade
12 and postsecondary education.
(2) Submit the metrics identified under subdivision (1) to the
SEA 199 — CC 1

7
general assembly in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(b) This section expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. IC 20-32-5.1-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.150-2024,
SECTION 55, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) The state board shall approve two (2) or
more benchmark, formative, interim, or similar assessments to identify
students that require remediation and provide individualized instruction
in which a school corporation, charter school, state accredited
nonpublic school, or eligible school (as defined in IC 20-51-1-4.7) may
receive a grant under subsection (g).
(b) For a benchmark, formative, interim, or similar assessment
described in subsection (a) that is administered to students in
kindergarten through grade 2, the assessment must meet one (1) or
more of the following:
(1) The assessment:
(A) focuses on English/language arts; and
(B) shows alignment, verified by a third party, to Indiana's
academic standards for English/language arts domains,
specifically foundational reading skills.
(2) The assessment is a universal screener that:
(A) meets the screening requirements listed in IC 20-35.5-2-2;
(B) measures foundational reading skills;
(C) received a convincing or partially convincing rating for
accuracy, reliability, and validity by the National Center on
Intensive Intervention or a nationally recognized dyslexia
assessment expert;
(D) screens for early literacy skill deficits;
(E) provides parents and schools with data analysis guides for
interpreting results and comprehensive support for schools to
guide classroom instruction and the implementation of reading
interventions; and
(F) provides the department with an annual analysis of
statewide data trends to support identification of early literacy
skill deficits and guides targeted intervention efforts.
(3) The assessment focuses on numeracy and shows alignment,
verified by a third party, to Indiana's academic standards for
mathematical domains, specifically:
(A) number sense;
(B) computation and algebraic thinking; and
(C) measurement.
(c) For a benchmark, formative, interim, or similar assessment
described in subsection (a) that is administered to students in grades 3
SEA 199 — CC 1

8
through 7, the assessment must show alignment, verified by a third
party, to Indiana's academic standards.
(d) For a benchmark, formative, interim, or similar assessment
described in subsection (a) that is administered to students in grades 8
through 10, the assessment must show alignment, verified by a third
party, to:
(1) Indiana's academic standards; or
(2) the nationally recognized college entrance exam required to be
administered under section 7 of this chapter.
(e) This subsection does not apply to an assessment that is a
universal screener described in subsection (b)(2). The majority of the
benchmark, formative, interim, or similar assessment reporting must
indicate the degree to which students are on track for grade level
proficiency and college and career readiness. Approved assessments
must also provide predictive study results for student performance on
the statewide summative assessment under section 7 of this chapter, not
later than two (2) years after the statewide summative assessment has
been first administered.
(f) This subsection does not apply to an assessment that is a
universal screener described in subsection (b)(2). A school corporation,
charter school, state accredited nonpublic school, or eligible school (as
defined in IC 20-51-1-4.7) may elect to administer a benchmark,
formative, interim, or similar assessment described in subsection (a).
If a school corporation, charter school, state accredited nonpublic
school, or eligible school (as defined in IC 20-51-1-4.7) administers an
assessment described in subsection (a), the school corporation, charter
school, state accredited nonpublic school, or eligible school (as defined
in IC 20-51-1-4.7) may prescribe the time and the manner in which the
assessment is administered.
(g) If a school corporation, charter school, state accredited
nonpublic school, or eligible school (as defined in IC 20-51-1-4.7)
elects to administer a benchmark, formative, interim, or similar
assessment described in subsection (a), the school corporation, charter
school, state accredited nonpublic school, or eligible school (as defined
in IC 20-51-1-4.7) is entitled to receive a grant or reimbursement from
the department in an amount not to exceed the cost of the assessment.
The department shall provide grants and reimbursements to a school
corporation, charter school, state accredited nonpublic school, or
eligible school (as defined in IC 20-51-1-4.7) under this section from
money appropriated to the department for the purpose of carrying out
this section.
(h) Except as provided in subsection (j), the state board and the
SEA 199 — CC 1

9
department may not contract with, approve, or endorse the use of a
single vendor to provide benchmark, formative, interim, or similar
assessments for any grade level or levels of kindergarten through grade
7.
(i) Before the state board may approve a benchmark, formative,
interim, or similar assessment described in subsection (a), the
assessment vendor must enter into a data share agreement with the
department in the manner prescribed by the department. A vendor
providing an assessment described in subsection (b)(2) shall provide
a summary of a student's assessment results to the student and the
student's parents. The summary of the results must be in an
understandable format for parents that is easy to read.
(j) The department shall procure a preferred assessment that meets
the requirements specified in subsection (b)(2) for use by schools in
which, over the course of three (3) consecutive years, fewer than
seventy percent (70%) an average of seventy-five percent (75%) of
students in the school achieved a valid passing score on the
determinant evaluation of reading skills approved by the state board.
(k) This subsection applies to:
(1) a public school, including a charter school;
(2) a state accredited nonpublic school; and
(3) an eligible school (as defined in IC 20-51-1-4.7).
An elementary school shall administer an assessment described in
subsection (b)(2) to students in kindergarten through grade 2. The
department shall provide guidance as to the number of times the
assessment is required and when the administrations of the assessment
should occur.
SECTION 6. IC 20-32-8.5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 291, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), the plan required by this chapter must include the
following:
(1) Reading skill standards for grade 1 through grade 3.
(2) A method for making determinant evaluations by grade 3 that
remedial action is required for a student, including:
(A) except as provided in subsections (c) and (g), beginning
with evaluations administered during the 2024-2025 school
year, retention of the student in grade 3 if the student has not
achieved a passing score on the determinant evaluation of
reading skills approved by the state board after the student has
had an opportunity to retake the determinant evaluation at least
twice in the summer; and
SEA 199 — CC 1

10
(B) the use of curricular materials and supplemental materials
aligned to the science of reading that are designed to address
deficiencies in reading;
after other methods of remediation have been evaluated or used,
or both, if reading skills are below the standard. Appropriate
consultation with parents or guardians must be part of the plan.
(3) A requirement that schools notify a student's parent of the
following:
(A) The student's assessment results regarding skill level in:
(i) phonemic awareness;
(ii) phonics;
(iii) fluency;
(iv) vocabulary; and
(v) comprehension.
(B) The student's assessment results on the determinant
evaluation of reading skills approved by the state board.
(C) Any intervention provided to the student or any remedial
action taken.
(4) A requirement that schools monitor the progress of students
who failed to achieve a valid passing score on the:
(A) determinant evaluation of reading skills approved by the
state board; or
(B) statewide assessment program test.
(5) A requirement that schools provide reading instruction that
includes a core reading program aligned with the science of
reading to all students in kindergarten through grade 8.
(6) A requirement for the administration of the determinant
evaluation of reading skills approved by the state board to
students in grade 2.
(7) A requirement that all students take the determinant
evaluation of reading skills approved by the state board until the
student:
(A) receives a passing score, regardless of the student's grade
level; or
(B) enters grade 7.
(8) A requirement that a school report the following to the
department:
(A) The literacy interventions that will be used for students in
grade 2 who are at risk of not being reading proficient and
students in grade 3 who do not achieve a valid passing score
on the determinant evaluation of reading skills approved by
the state board.
SEA 199 — CC 1

11
(B) The literacy interventions in use before the adoption of the
plan for students in grade 2 who are at risk of not being
reading proficient and students in grade 3 who do not achieve
a valid passing score on the determinant evaluation of reading
skills approved by the state board.
(C) The literacy interventions in use before the adoption of the
plan for students who do not achieve a valid passing score on
the determinant evaluation of reading skills approved by the
state board.
(D) The number of students being served by the interventions
described in clauses (B) and (C).
(E) The cost of providing the interventions described in
clauses (B) and (C).
(F) Any other information requested by the department.
(9) Requirements for a school in which, over the course of three
(3) consecutive years, fewer than seventy an average of
seventy-five percent (70%) (75%) of students of the school
achieved a valid passing score on the determinant evaluation of
reading skills approved by the state board that must include the
following:
(A) Use of curriculum that is:
(i) based on the science of reading;
(ii) age appropriate; and
(iii) approved by the department.
(B) Employment of the following:
(i) Before July 1, 2025, an instructional coach who is trained
in the science of reading, as determined by the department.
This item expires January 1, 2026.
(ii) After June 30, 2025, an instructional coach with a
literacy related endorsement who is trained in the science of
reading.
(C) Use of only benchmark, formative, interim, or similar
assessments that:
(i) show alignment with Indiana's academic standards; and
(ii) are approved by the department.
(D) Use of a screener procured under IC 20-32-5.1-17(j).
(10) The fiscal impact of each component of the plan, if any. In
determining whether a component has a fiscal impact,
consideration shall be given to whether the component will
increase costs to the state or a school corporation or require the
state or school corporation to reallocate resources.
(b) A school may receive a waiver of the requirements provided in
SEA 199 — CC 1

12
511 IAC 6.2-3.1-4(a)(2) if the state board approves an alternative
reading plan provided by the school.
(c) Except as approved by the department under subsection (g), a
student who would otherwise be subject to retention in grade 3 under
the plan is not subject to the retention requirement only if the student
meets one (1) of the following criteria:
(1) The student was subject to retention and has been retained in
grade 3 for one (1) school year.
(2) The student has an intellectual disability or the student's
individualized education program specifies that retention is not
appropriate, and the student's case conference committee has
determined that promotion to another grade is appropriate.
(3) The student is an English learner who has received services
for fewer than two (2) years and a committee consisting of:
(A) the student's parent;
(B) a building level administrator or designee;
(C) a classroom teacher of service;
(D) an English learner teacher of record, if one exists; and
(E) an English learner district administrator, if one exists;
determines that promotion is appropriate based on the
implementation of research based instructional practices outlined
in the student's individual learning plan.
(4) The student received a score of proficient or above proficient
in grade 3 math on the statewide summative assessment.
(5) The student:
(A) has received intensive intervention as determined by the
department in reading for two (2) or more years; and
(B) was retained more than one (1) time throughout
kindergarten, grade 1, or grade 2.
(d) A student who is not subject to the retention requirement as
provided under subsection (c) must be provided with additional reading
instruction that is aligned with the science of reading until the student
achieves a passing score on the determinant evaluation of reading skills
approved by the state board.
(e) Before October 1 of each school year, the department shall:
(1) identify each incoming student (as defined in section 0.7 of
this chapter) enrolled in kindergarten in a school in Indiana; and
(2) notify the parent or guardian of the student of the retention
requirement under this chapter for grade 3 students who do not
achieve a passing score on the Indiana reading evaluation and
determination (IRead3).
(f) The department shall establish a standard reporting process and
SEA 199 — CC 1

13
reporting window for schools to report students who qualify for an
exemption under subsection (c).
(g) The department shall establish a registration process for schools
to exempt an English language learner who:
(1) does not achieve a passing score on the determinant
evaluation of reading skills approved by the state board; and
(2) attends a school that has a student population comprised of at
least fifty percent (50%) of English language learners in grade 3,
as determined by the department;
from compliance with the requirements under subsection (a)(2)(A)
until the beginning of the 2027-2028 school year. This subsection
expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 7. IC 20-32-8.5-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.199-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) As used in this section, "Indiana literacy
cadre" refers to the department's collaborative professional
development initiative for educators that is aligned with the science of
reading.
(b) Subject to available funding, a school in which, over the course
of three (3) consecutive years, fewer than seventy percent (70%) an
average of seventy-five percent (75%) of students of the school
achieved a valid passing score on the determinant evaluation of reading
approved by the state board must participate in the Indiana literacy
cadre.
SECTION 8. IC 21-18-6-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) Not later than December 1, 2026, the
commission shall do the following:
(1) Evaluate accrediting agencies or associations that
currently accredit:
(A) state educational institutions; or
(B) degree programs offered by state educational
institutions.
(2) Identify and evaluate innovative accrediting agencies or
associations, including those not yet recognized by the United
States Department of Education, that do not currently
accredit state educational institutions.
(3) Identify potential alternative agencies, associations, or
methods to accredit degree programs offered by state
educational institutions.
(4) Provide a report in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6
to the general assembly that includes:
SEA 199 — CC 1

14
(A) the commission's findings under subdivisions (1)
through (3); and
(B) recommendations concerning accrediting agencies or
associations identified in subdivisions (2) and (3) that may
be best suited to serve as an accreditor for state
educational institutions or degree programs.
(b) This section expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 9. IC 21-18-9-10.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 248, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.7. (a) For each state educational
institution degree program, if: the:
(1) the:
(A) average number of students who graduate over the
immediately preceding three (3) years is fewer than:
(A) (i) ten (10) students for a particular associate degree
program;
(B) (ii) fifteen (15) students for a particular bachelor's
degree program;
(C) (iii) seven (7) students for a particular master's degree
program;
(D) (iv) three (3) students for a particular education
specialist program; or
(E) (v) three (3) students for a particular doctorate degree
program; and or
(B) degree program meets the definition of a low earning
outcome program under the Higher Education Act (20
U.S.C. 1087d); and
(2) the state educational institution would like to continue a
degree program described in subdivision (1);
the state educational institution must request approval from the
commission to continue the degree program.
(b) If the commission does not grant approval under subsection (a),
the state educational institution must eliminate:
(1) the degree program; and
(2) any costs associated with the degree program.
SECTION 10. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) 511
IAC 13-1-1(b)(6) is void. The publisher of the Indiana
Administrative Code and Indiana Register shall remove this
provision from the Indiana Administrative Code.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 11. An emergency is declared for this act.
SEA 199 — CC 1

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 199 — CC 1